Massachusetts, session 194th, S2109.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 3(f) of Massachusetts General Laws Chapter 268A is hereby
amended by inserting immediately before the end of subsection (iv) the following: "; provided,
however, that no exclusion shall be established for travel expenses paid or reimbursed by an
organization that, for the year in which the travel commences, is registered with the State
Secretary as a Client under the Massachusetts Lobbying Law, Massachusetts General Laws
Chapter 3 Sections 39 and 41."
SECTION 2. The State Ethics Commission shall maintain, and make available to any
member of the public upon request, a remotely accessible electronic data base of all travel
expense disclosure forms filed by elected public officials as required by the Commission's
regulations at 930 CMR 5.00. The electronic data base shall be searchable by name of the elected
public official filing the disclosure.
of 2

SECTION 3. The State Ethics Commission shall revise the travel expense disclosure
form filed by elected public officials to include whether the official has, within the 12 months
prior to the commencement of travel, been the subject of legislative lobbying by the organization
paying his or her travel expenses with respect to legislation filed with the General Court. For the
purposes of this Section 3, the terms "legislative lobbying" and "legislation" shall have the
meanings given them by Massachusetts General Laws Chapter 3 Section 39.
of 2